Utah statutes.
76-8-305.   Interference with arresting officer.

A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if he has knowledge, or by the exercise of reasonable care should have knowledge, that a peace officer is seeking to effect a lawful arrest or detention of that person or another and interferes with the arrest or detention by:

(1)  use of force or any weapon;

(2)  the arrested person's refusal to perform any act required by lawful order:

(a)  necessary to effect the arrest or detention; and

(b)  made by a peace officer involved in the arrest or detention; or

(3)  the arrested person's or another person's refusal to refrain from performing any act that would impede the arrest or detention.

